Massachusetts, session 194th, H4343.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 17C of chapter 32A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in the first paragraph, the words “or certified
nurse midwife;” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “certified nurse midwife, or
licensed certified professional midwife;” and is further amended in the second paragraph by
striking out the following words “or certified nurse midwife” and inserting in place thereof the
following words:- “certified nurse midwife, or licensed certified professional midwife”.
SECTION 2. Said section 17C of chapter 32A as so appearing, is hereby further amended
in the third paragraph by striking out the following words “for abortion or abortion-related care”
as appearing in both instances.
SECTION 3. Said section 17C of chapter 32A, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the sixth paragraph the following paragraph:-
The commission shall ensure plan compliance with this section.
of 5

SECTION 4. Section 10A of chapter 118E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in the first paragraph, the words “or certified
nurse midwife;” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “certified nurse midwife, or
licensed certified professional midwife;” and is further amended in the second paragraph by
striking out the following words” or certified nurse midwife” and inserting in place thereof the
following words:- “certified nurse midwife, or licensed certified professional midwife”.
SECTION 5. Said section 10A of chapter 118E of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby further amended by inserting after the third paragraph the the following two paragraphs:-
Nothing in this section shall be construed to deny or restrict the division’s authority to
ensure its contracted health insurers, health plans, health maintenance organizations, behavioral
health management firms and third-party administrators under contract to a Medicaid managed
care organization or primary care clinician plan are in compliance with this chapter.
The division shall ensure plan compliance with this chapter.
SECTION 6. Section 47F of chapter 175 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in the second paragraph, the words “or
certified nurse midwife;” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “certified nurse
midwife, or licensed certified professional midwife;” and is further amended in the third
paragraph by striking out the following words” or certified nurse midwife” and inserting in place
thereof the following words:- “certified nurse midwife, or licensed certified professional
midwife”.
of 5

SECTION 7. Said section 47F of chapter 175 as so appearing, is hereby further amended
in the fourth paragraph by striking out the following words “for abortion or abortion-related
care” as appearing in both instances.
SECTION 8. Said section 47F of chapter 175, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
by inserting after the seventh paragraph the following paragraph:-
The commissioner shall ensure plan compliance with this section.
SECTION 9. Section 8H of chapter 176A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in the second paragraph, the words “or
certified nurse midwife;” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “certified nurse
midwife, or licensed midwife;” and is further amended by striking out, in the third paragraph,
following words” or certified nurse midwife” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
“certified nurse midwife, or licensed certified professional midwife”.
SECTION 10. Said section 8H of chapter 176A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby further amended in the fourth paragraph by striking out the following words “for abortion
or abortion-related care” as appearing in both instances.
SECTION 11. Said section 8H of chapter 176A, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the seventh paragraph the following paragraph:-
The commissioner shall ensure plan compliance with this section.
SECTION 12. Section 4H of chapter 176B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in the second paragraph, the words “or
certified nurse midwife;” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “certified nurse
of 5

midwife, or licensed certified professional midwife;” and is further amended in the third
paragraph by striking out the following words” or certified nurse midwife” and inserting in place
thereof the following words:- “certified nurse midwife, or licensed certified professional
midwife”.
SECTION 13. Said section 4H of chapter 176B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby amended in the fourth paragraph by striking out the following words “for abortion or
abortion-related care” as appearing in both instances.
SECTION 14. Said section 4H of chapter 176B, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the seventh paragraph the the following paragraph:-
The commissioner shall ensure plan compliance with this section.
SECTION 15. Section 4I of chapter 176G of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in the first paragraph, the words “or certified
nurse midwife;” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “certified nurse midwife, or
licensed certified professional midwife;” and is further amended in the second paragraph by
striking out the following words” or certified nurse midwife” and inserting in place thereof the
following words:- “certified nurse midwife, or licensed certified professional midwife”.
SECTION 16. Said section 4I of chapter 176G of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby amended in the third paragraph by striking out the following words “for abortion or
abortion-related care” as appearing in both instances.
SECTION 17. Said section 4I of chapter 176G, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after the sixth paragraph the following paragraph:-
of 5

The commissioner shall ensure plan compliance with this section.
SECTION 18. Sections 1 to 17, inclusive, shall apply to all policies, contracts and
certificates of health insurance subject to chapters 32A, 118E, 175, 176A, 176B and 176G of the
General Laws that are delivered, issued or renewed 6 months from the effective date of this act.
of 5